South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4468.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 33, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-33-55.  (A)(1) A local advisory council for educating students with disabilities must be established for each local school district by its board of trustees and for each charter school authorizer by the authorizer's governing body. (2) The school district board or charter school board shall appoint the members of its local advisory council. Membership of a local advisory council must be composed of individuals involved in or concerned with the education of students with disabilities, including: (a) parents or legal guardians of students with disabilities enrolled in a school in the district or a school of the authorizer, provided such parents and legal guardians must comprise at least fifty-one percent of the membership of the council; (b) one student with a disability as determined by an Individual Education Program who is enrolled in a school in the district or a school of the authorizer; (c) one public school administrator from a school in the district or a school of the authorizer; (d) one representative from the district office or employed by the authorizer with expertise in special education; (e) two special education teachers who must be employed by the school district or by a school of the authorizer, one of whom works with students in grades K-8 and one of whom works with students in grades 9-12; and (f) members of the community at the discretion of the local board. (3) Terms of initial membership on a local advisory council must be for one year after which future terms must be set forth in the council's bylaws pursuant to item (5)(a) provided, however, members of local school district advisory councils serve at the pleasure of the local school board of trustees. (4) Ninety days prior to the first meeting of the local advisory council, the district or authorizer superintendent shall accept applications from individuals interested in serving on a local advisory council. The superintendent shall ensure the board membership composition requirements of item (2) are met. (5) A local board of trustees shall adopt bylaws that: (a) establish terms of service after the initial terms of service, the manner of selecting its council chair, and the manner of filling vacancies on the council; (b) ensure at least fifty-one percent of its membership includes parents or guardians who have a student with a disability enrolled in the district or authorizer's schools; and (c) other rules and procedures the board considers necessary and appropriate. (B) The functions of a local advisory council are to: (1) advise the local board of trustees and district superintendent or charter governing board and charter authorizer of the needs of students with disabilities including matters of student safety; (2) comment on district or school improvement plans for students with disabilities; (3) comment on school compliance with state and federal laws and regulations regarding the education of students with disabilities; (4) advise the South Carolina Advisory Council for Educating Students with Disabilities (ACESD) regarding local special education efforts and recommendations for improvements to the delivery of special education services and instruction; and (5) serve as advocates for students with disabilities and their parents or guardians. (C) A local advisory council shall: (1) meet at least four times annually; and (2) provide an annual report to its local governing body and to the ACESD regarding its activities and recommendations as required by subsection (B)(4). (D) The local school district or charter school authorizer shall provide administrative assistance to the local advisory council that it creates pursuant to this section. (E) Local advisory boards are encouraged to collaborate with local organizations whose missions are to assist students with disabilities and their families. (F)(1) Before December 1, 2026, the ACESD, with assistance from the State Department of Education, shall create and adopt model bylaws for use by local advisory councils. (2) Before May 1, 2027, local advisory councils shall submit their proposed bylaws to the ACESD for approval. (3) Before September 1, 2027, the first meeting of each local advisory council must be held. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----